Idaho, session 2025, S1038.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 73, Title 39, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 73
MISCELLANEOUS HEALTH PROVISIONS
39-7301. WORLD HEALTH ORGANIZATION MANDATES. (1) The state of Idaho
and its political subdivisions, including but not limited to counties,
cities, towns, precincts, water districts, school districts, school admin-
istrative units, or quasi-public entities, shall not be compelled to engage
in the enforcement of, or any collaboration with the enforcement of, any
requirements or mandates issued by the world health organization.
(2) Any requirements or mandates issued by the world health organiza-
tion shall not be used in the state as a basis for action or to direct, order,
or otherwise impose, contrary to the constitution and laws of this state,
any requirements whatsoever, including those for masks, vaccines, or medi-
cal testing, or to gather any public or private information about the state's
citizens or residents and shall have no force or effect in this state.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.